Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-241
Established business relationship, defined.

Established business relationship means a prior or existing relationship formed by a voluntary two-way communication between a person and a residential or business telephone subscriber, with or without an exchange of consideration, on the basis of an inquiry, application, purchase, or transaction by the subscriber regarding products or services offered by the person, which relationship has not been previously terminated by either party.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1205;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 103.